Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.500

Deposits in court—Custody of money deposited.

Money deposited, or paid into a court in an action, shall not be loaned out, unless, with the consent of all parties having an interest in, or making claim to the same.

[Code 1881 s 197; 1877 p 41 s 201; 1869 p 49 s 201; 1854 p 163 s 176; RRS s 747.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 67.